District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.76a

Scope of practice for body artists.

For the purposes of this part, the practice of body art does not include:

(1)

A licensed physician or surgeon performing body art services for medical reasons;

(2)

A licensed funeral director performing body-piercing or tattooing services as required by that profession;

(3)

Laser tattoo removal procedures; or

(4)

Skin treatment procedures such as chemical peels or microdermabrasion.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-193, § 3(g), 59 DCR 10388